Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.572

Early intervention services—Infants and toddlers with disabilities—Interagency coordinating council—Conditions and limitations.

For the purposes of implementing this chapter, the governor shall appoint a state interagency coordinating council for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families and ensure that state agencies involved in the provision of, or payment for, early intervention services to infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families shall coordinate and collaborate in the planning and delivery of such services.

No state or local agency currently providing early intervention services to infants and toddlers with disabilities may use funds appropriated for early intervention services for infants and toddlers with disabilities to supplant funds from other sources.

All state and local agencies shall ensure that the implementation of this chapter will not cause any interruption in existing early intervention services for infants and toddlers with disabilities.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit the restriction or reduction of eligibility under Title V of the Social Security Act, P.L. 90-248, relating to maternal and child health or Title XIX of the Social Security Act, P.L. 89-97, relating to medicaid for infants and toddlers with disabilities.

[ 2020 c 114 s 6; 2016 c 57 s 1; 1998 c 245 s 125; 1992 c 198 s 15. Formerly RCW 43.215.472, 70.195.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.